Utah statutes.
76-10-3108.   Attorney general may bring action for injunctive relief, damages, or civil penalty.

(1)  The attorney general may bring an action for appropriate injunctive relief, and for damages or a civil penalty in the name of the state, any of its political subdivisions or agencies, or as parens patriae on behalf of natural persons in this state, for a violation of this act.  Actions may be brought under this section regardless of whether the plaintiff dealt directly or indirectly with the defendant.  This remedy is an additional remedy to any other remedies provided by law.  It may not diminish or offset any other remedy.

(2)  Any individual who violates this act is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $100,000 for each violation.  Any person, other than an individual, who violates this act is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $500,000 for each violation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

